Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 7

Tennessee Heritage Conservation Trust Fund Act of 2005

11-7-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Heritage Conservation Trust Fund Act of 2005.”

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 1.

11-7-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the governing body of the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund;

“Nonprofit organization” means an entity that is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a)), as an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)); and

“Trust fund” means the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2.

11-7-103. Establishment — Purpose — Fund moneys — Carry forward of fund balance and earnings — Solicitation and receipt of gifts, contributions, bequests, donations and grants — Authority to establish nonprofit organization.

The Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund is hereby established as a special agency account in the state general fund. The purpose of this trust fund is to assist the state in permanently conserving and preserving tracts of land within this state for the purposes of promoting tourism and recreation, including outdoor activities, such as hunting, fishing, equestrian activities and hiking; protecting, conserving and restoring the state's physical, cultural, archeological, historical and environmental resources; and preserving working landscapes.

Moneys in the trust fund shall be invested by the state treasurer, in accordance with applicable general law, except as qualified by this chapter. The state treasurer shall hold the trust fund separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts.

Any balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the trust fund shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Investment earnings credited to the assets of the trust fund, including, but not limited to, interest, shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

The trust fund is authorized to request and receive gifts, contributions, bequests, donations, and grants from any legal and appropriate source to effectuate its purpose. Any such funds received shall be deposited into the trust fund; provided, that, if any such items are not in the form of funds, any income, rents, or proceeds generated from the items shall be deposited into the trust fund.

The trust fund is authorized to create or establish a nonprofit organization, which shall also be eligible to request and receive gifts, contributions, bequests, donations and grants from any legal and appropriate source to effectuate the trust fund's purpose.

Moneys in the trust fund, and in any nonprofit entity created pursuant to subsection (f), shall be expended only in accordance with, and for the purposes stated in, this chapter. No part of the fund shall be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund for any purpose whatsoever.

This subsection (h) is contingent upon a four-million-dollar ($4,000,000) appropriation being made to the trust fund in the 2009 general appropriations act. This section and any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, in the five (5) or fewer fiscal years beginning July 1, 2010, the commissioner of finance and administration annually shall transfer from the heritage conservation trust fund to the general fund an amount of nine hundred thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($937,500), plus annual interest earnings on that amount, plus any unexpended balance of four million dollars ($4,000,000) remaining after certain commitments of the trust fund have been satisfied, plus other available sources, until the general fund has been reimbursed for a four-million-dollar ($4,000,000) appropriation made in fiscal year 2008-2009. The four-million-dollar appropriation has been provided to allow the state to fulfill commitments made before November 2008, while a nine million three hundred seventy-five thousand dollar ($9,375,000) lease payment for timber rights is earned over a ten-year period. For purposes of this subsection (h), the term “other available sources” shall not include gifts, contributions, bequests, donations and grants, if the funds are restricted for specific acquisitions or purposes.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2; 2009, ch. 531, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 13, which added § 11-7-103(h), provided that the subsection is contingent upon a four-million-dollar ($4,000,000) appropriation being made to the trust fund in the 2009 general appropriations act. Funding was provided by Acts 2009, ch. 554, § 8, Item 19(b).

For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

11-7-104. Board of trustees — Annual report — Audit.

There is hereby established the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund board of trustees. The board shall be attached to the department of environment and conservation for administrative purposes, but shall be independent of the department. Expenditures from the trust fund shall be made only upon authorization of the board.

The board shall consist of eleven (11) members.

Trustees shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by each house of the general assembly, but appointments shall be effective until adversely acted upon by the general assembly.

Persons appointed to the board shall include persons knowledgeable in the areas of land acquisition, management, conservation and protection.

The membership of the board shall appropriately reflect the racial and geographic diversity of this state. At no time shall the membership of the board be composed of more than four (4) members who reside in any one (1) of the grand divisions, as defined in title 4, chapter 1, part 2.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner of agriculture, and the executive director of the wildlife resources agency, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the board.

The governor shall appoint a board chair from the membership of the board. Other officers shall be selected as provided in the bylaws of the fund.

Trustees shall serve four-year, renewable terms; provided, that of the initial trustees appointed:

Three (3) trustees shall be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years;

Three (3) trustees shall be appointed for an initial term of three (3) years;

Three (3) trustees shall be appointed for an initial term of two (2) years; and

Two (2) trustees shall be appointed for an initial term of one (1) year.

Should a board position become vacant through resignation, removal, or other cause, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve the unexpired term, subject to confirmation of each house of the general assembly, as provided in subsection (b). Trustees shall continue to serve on the board after the expiration of the trustee's term until a new trustee is appointed.

A quorum of the board shall be seven (7) trustees.

Trustees shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but may be reimbursed for those expenses allowed by the comprehensive travel regulations, as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall adopt and implement a policy related to conflicts of interest, to ensure that all trustees avoid any situation that creates an actual or perceived conflict of interest related to the work of the trust fund.

The board shall submit an annual report to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, speaker of the senate, comptroller of the treasury, chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate, chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives, chair of the government operations committee of the senate, and chair of the government operations committee of the house of representatives, by June 30 of each year. Such report shall include detailed information on the operation and financial status of the trust fund and any nonprofit entity created pursuant to § 11-7-103(f).

The trust fund and any nonprofit entity created pursuant to § 11-7-103(f) shall be subject to an annual audit by the comptroller of the treasury, and the trust fund or entity shall bear the full costs of this audit.

Operating expenses of the board and its staff shall be paid from the fund.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2; 2012, ch. 604, § 13; 2013, ch. 236, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund board of trustees, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

11-7-105. Authority of board.

In carrying out the purposes of the trust fund, the board is authorized to do the following:

Acquire for the state, by purchase or by donation, and convey, sell, exchange, lease or otherwise transfer any interest in real property; the board, however, does not have the power of eminent domain;

Make grants or loans to state, federal or local governments and to nonprofit organizations, in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, grants or loans provided to acquire a fee simple or other interest in real property;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements, other than grants or loans pursuant to subdivision (2), with state, federal and local governments, with private individuals and corporations, and with associations and organizations, as the trust fund may deem necessary or convenient for the fund to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

Adopt policies and guidelines for the use of the trust fund, including the procedure for identifying projects, establishing conservation priorities and allocating money from the trust fund;

Make such studies and recommendations concerning the conservation programs and policies of the department of environment and conservation as it may deem appropriate to a sound conservation program; and

Take any other necessary actions to carry out this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2; 2012, ch. 986, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

11-7-106. Loans and grants — Repayment — Proceeds — Application requirements — Financial statements of applicant — Terms of agreements with board.

The board shall make grants or loans pursuant to § 11-7-105, only after the recipient entity has entered into an agreement with the trust fund, on the terms and conditions specified by the board. After approving a grant or loan, the board may assist the grantee in carrying out the purposes of the grant.

When awarding grants or making loans pursuant to this section, the board may require repayment of those funds on the terms and conditions the board deems appropriate. Proceeds from the repayment or reimbursement of amounts granted or loaned by the board shall be deposited in the fund.

Any entity applying for a grant or loan from the trust fund to acquire an interest in real property shall specify the following in the grant or loan application:

The intended use of the property;

The intended ultimate owner of the property;

The entity that will be responsible for managing the property;

The funding source for the cost of ongoing management; and

Any other information required by the board.

Any entity applying for a grant or loan from the trust fund to acquire an interest in real property shall provide a copy of the organization's most recent audited annual financial statements. Such statements must have been prepared within two (2) years of the date of the grant application.

In order to receive a grant from the trust fund to assist in the acquisition of any interest in real property, a public agency or nonprofit organization must enter into an agreement with the board. The terms of such agreement shall include the following:

The terms under which the interest in real property is ultimately acquired shall be subject to the board's approval;

The interest in real property acquired under the grant shall not be used as security for a debt, unless the board approves the transaction;

The board shall take appropriate action to protect the public interest in the acquisition, by ensuring that the land will be permanently conserved. In meeting this obligation, the board shall employ appropriate means, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of conservation easements or reversionary interests;

Any subsequent transfer of an interest in the real property acquired pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to approval of the board, and a new agreement, sufficient to protect the public interest, shall be entered into between the board and the transferee;

A description of the level of use that will be allowed on the property. In awarding grants pursuant to this chapter, the board shall take appropriate action to ensure the preservation of a public benefit that is consistent with the public interest in the acquisition;

A requirement that the public agency or nonprofit organization provide to the state an independent appraisal of the fair market value of the interest in real property to be acquired; and

A requirement that the public agency or nonprofit organization provide to the state a copy of a financial audit of the agency or organization that has been prepared by an independent public accountant for the most recent completed fiscal year. In addition, the agency or organization shall be required to provide the state with such an audit for subsequent fiscal years during the term of the grant agreement.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2.

11-7-107. Acquisitions and disposals of interests in real property.

Acquisitions and disposals of any interest in real property, other than the acquisition of conservation easements and reversionary interests, acquired for the state by the trust fund, or the nonprofit organization created under § 11-7-103(f), shall be subject to the requirements of § 4-15-102(d) and § 12-2-112. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the acquisition of conservation easements and reversionary interests by the trust fund and the acquisition of any interest in real property by a non-state public agency, or a nonprofit organization using grant funds received from the trust fund, shall only require that such real property interest be promptly reported to the state building commission, and shall not be subject to § 4-15-102(d) or § 12-2-112, or any other approval otherwise required by state law.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2.

11-7-108. Exemption from taxes.

Real property in which the trust fund acquires a fee simple interest for the state shall be exempt from all state and local property taxes.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2.

11-7-109. Conservation compensation fund — Determination of tax ramifications — Reimbursement for lost taxes.

There is hereby created a special agency account in the state general fund to be known as the conservation compensation fund. Expenditures from such fund shall only be made to implement and effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Funds deposited in such fund shall not revert at the end of any fiscal year, and all interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be returned to and made a part of the fund.

On or before January 1 of each year, the commissioner of general services shall certify to the comptroller of the treasury such information as is necessary to identify the parcels of property that have been rendered tax exempt through acquisition by the state pursuant to this chapter during the prior fiscal year. The comptroller of the treasury shall determine the appropriate tax rate and assessed value of each such parcel of property, and on or before March 1 of each year, shall certify to the commissioner of finance and administration the amount of property tax revenue lost by each affected city or county the prior fiscal year. The assessed value shall be based on the use value provided for in title 67, chapter 5, part 10, if the property is of sufficient size to have been classified under that part. Acquisition by the state, pursuant to this chapter, of property classified under title 67, chapter 5, part 10, shall not constitute a change in the use of the property, and no rollback taxes shall become due solely as a result of such acquisition. If the property is not of sufficient size to have been classified under title 67, chapter 5, part 10, the assessed value shall be determined according to the same basis as other like property within the jurisdiction. Each subsequent yearly reimbursement amount shall be based on the same assessed value, tax rate and use in effect on the date of purchase. The commissioner of finance and administration shall reimburse each affected city and county the amount so determined, from funds available in the conservation compensation fund. In any year in which funds available in the conservation compensation fund are insufficient to fully reimburse such cities and counties, the commissioner of finance and administration shall effect a transfer of funds from the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund to the conservation compensation fund, in an amount sufficient to fully reimburse the affected cities and counties. Funds transferred from the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund to the conservation compensation fund, along with interest, if any, accruing on such funds after their transfer to the conservation compensation fund, shall be expended to reimburse affected cities and counties only for lands acquired by the state under this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 444, § 2; 2020, ch. 795, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “general services” for “finance and administration” and inserted “during the prior fiscal year”, and at the end of the second sentence, substituted “fiscal year” for “calendar year”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 795, § 3. July 15, 2020.

11-7-110. Executive director.

In carrying out the purposes of the trust fund, the commissioner of environment and conservation is authorized to appoint an executive director to carry out this chapter.

The commissioner of environment and conservation shall set the salary for the executive director.

The executive director may hire other staff necessary to carry out this chapter.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.